Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-167
Compensation court; record.

The Nebraska
Workers' Compensation Court shall keep and maintain a full and true record of
all proceedings, documents, or papers ordered filed, rules and regulations,
and decisions or orders.

Laws 1917, c. 85, § 29, p. 221;

C.S.1922, § 3080;

C.S.1929, § 48-157;

Laws 1935, c. 57, § 36, p. 205;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-157;

R.S.1943, § 48-167;

Laws 1945, c. 113, § 7, p. 366;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 100;

Laws 2011, LB151, § 6.